California statutes. Business and Professions Code
Except as provided in Section 12509, any person who removes or obliterates any tag or device placed upon any weight, measure, or weighing or measuring instrument by a sealer is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

12509.

(a) When any weight, measure, or weighing or measuring instrument has been repaired and corrected, and has been reinspected and found correct, the sealer shall remove the tag or device with the words “out of order,” and shall seal and mark that weight, measure, or weighing or measuring instrument in the manner provided for the marking of the same where, upon inspection, it is found correct.

(b) Upon completion of corrective repairs or adjustments, and with the authorization from the sealer, a registered service agency, as defined in Section 12531, may remove an “out of order” tag or device, and the weight, measure, or weighing or measuring instrument may be placed in service pending reinspection by the sealer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 662, Sec. 2.   (AB 1181)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12509.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, “EVSE” or “electric vehicle supply equipment” means a device that is used in connection with the sale of electricity as a motor vehicle fuel for controlling the electricity supply from an
 electric vehicle charging station to a vehicle during a charging session and that includes a measuring instrument.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 12532, if an EVSE has previously been placed in service by a service agency or sealer, the EVSE shall not be required to be retested or placed in service by a service agency or sealer before the EVSE is used after receiving maintenance in a
 manner that does not affect the EVSE being correct.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 399, Sec. 1.   (AB 2453)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12510.

(a) Any person, who by himself or herself, or through or for another, does any of the following is guilty of a misdemeanor:

(1) Uses, for commercial purposes, or retains in his or her possession an incorrect weight or measure or weighing or measuring instrument.

(2) Sells any weight or measure used for commercial purposes, or weighing or measuring instrument which has not been sealed within one year, except weighing or measuring instruments required to be assembled prior to use.

(3) Uses any condemned weight or measure or weighing or measuring instrument contrary to law.

(4) Uses, for commercial purposes, or for determining the charge for a service, any weight or measure or weighing or measuring instrument which is not kept at a fixed location, which does not bear a current or previous year’s seal, and which, upon test by the sealer, is found to be incorrect, unless a written request for an inspection of the weighing or measuring instrument has been made to the county sealer. However, the use of any weight or measure or weighing or measuring instrument used by a public utility in connection with measuring gas, electricity, water, steam, or communication service subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission is exempt from this chapter.

(5) Sells or uses any device or instrument
 to be used or calculated to falsify any weight or measure.

(6) So locates or positions a weighing or measuring device used in retail trade, except as used exclusively in the preparation of packages put up in advance of sale, that its indications cannot be accurately read by the purchaser under ordinary circumstances.

(7) Uses, for commercial purposes, a weighing or measuring device designed to automatically compute price unless the computed price is a true mathematical computation of the amount times the price per unit.

(8) Willfully and knowingly uses, for commercial purposes, a measuring device designed to automatically compute price unless the indicators of quantity and the total computed price on the device has been returned to zero prior to the beginning of each delivery of that commodity or thing.

(9) Fails to deliver for test to a designated location after receipt of a written notice from a weights and measure official, any device that is ordinarily tested at a central location.

(10) Sells, rents, leases, loans, or knowingly installs an incorrect weighing or measuring instrument for commercial purposes.

(b) The possession of an incorrect weight or measure or weighing or measuring instrument or records thereof is prima facie evidence of intention to violate the law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 338, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

12511.

Any weight, measure, or weighing or measuring instrument tested and found correct by any sealer may be used within this state without any further test for such period as is authorized in the regulations adopted by the secretary pursuant to Section 12212. If tested and sealed and certified to as correct by the National Institute of Standards and Technology, any weight, measure, or weighing or measuring instrument may be sold without being first
 tested and sealed by a sealer. In either case, it shall be subject to inspection and testing notwithstanding that it has been tested and sealed either by a sealer or by the National Institute of Standards and Technology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 58.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12511.1.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this division, any weight or measure, or weighing or measuring instrument, found correct or corrected by a registered service agency, as defined in Section 12531, authorized pursuant to Section 12509, may be used commercially pending reinspection by a sealer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 662, Sec. 3.   (AB 1181)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12512.

When the sale of any commodity is based upon a quantity representation either furnished by the purchaser or obtained through the use of equipment supplied by the purchaser, the purchaser shall in no case buy the commodity according to any quantity which is less than the true quantity of the commodity or compute the purchase price of the commodity according to a price per unit of measure that is less than the highest applicable
 price per unit of measure that is represented by the purchaser to the seller for the commodity, or, where applicable, less than a price per unit that is established by law, in statute, or by regulation. Violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 662, Sec. 4.   (AB 1181)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12513.

Any sealing or testing of any weight, measure, weighing or measuring instrument by any employee of the department authorized for the purpose shall have the same force and effect as a sealing or testing by a sealer or his deputy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12514.

No sealer shall sell or be interested directly or indirectly in the sale of any weighing or measuring instrument, nor shall he accept a fee, compensation, or gratuity of any kind for adjusting or repairing any weighing or measuring instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1615.)
-------------------------------------------

12515.

(a) Any person having made repairs or adjustments to any weighing instrument or to any measuring instrument, or any person having sold, rented, leased, loaned, or installed any such instrument, who within 24 hours after the instrument has been sold, rented, leased, loaned, installed, repaired, or adjusted, fails to notify the sealer of the county in which the instrument has been sold, rented, leased, loaned, installed, repaired, or adjusted, that the sale, rent, lease, loan, installation, repair, or adjustment has been made, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) This section
 does not require notification to the sealer for an adjustment to a weighing or measuring instrument only for the purpose of maintaining it in a zero or balance condition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 742, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12516.

It shall be unlawful for any person to locate or position any scale used in connection with the auctioning of livestock so that its indications are not readily and clearly readable to the buyer and seller, unless a state certificate of weights and measures, made at the time of weighing, attesting to the weight of the livestock, is issued upon request to the buyer and seller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 117.)
-------------------------------------------

12517.

Every owner of a coin-operated person weigher shall place on such weigher, in a prominent position, in letters at least three-sixteenths inches in height and in bold type, the following statement: “This scale may not have been checked for accuracy.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1286.)
-------------------------------------------

12518.

A water submeter submitted to a sealer by an owner, user, or operator for inspection and testing before its initial installation that is found to be incorrect, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 12500, shall be marked with the words “Out of Order,” in accordance with Section 12506, and shall be returned to a service agent only if both of the following conditions are met:

(a) The water submeter has no signs of intentional tampering by which to facilitate fraud.

(b) The water submeter is not placed into service in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 15.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12519.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, an owner, user, or operator of a water submeter that has previously been sealed, installed, and used commercially who submits the water submeter to a sealer for inspection and testing shall not be subject to criminal prosecution or liable for other fines or other penalties for a violation of any provision of this division, if the device is found to be incorrect, if all of the following conditions apply:

(1) The water submeter had, prior to installation and use, been submitted to a county sealer as one of a submeter lot where the lot was sampled and tested for compliance with all applicable laws and all applicable regulations adopted by the secretary in accordance with Section 12107.

(2) The specific water submeter had, at no prior time, been directly subjected to a physical test of its performance characteristics or accuracy by a county sealer.

(3) The specific water submeter has been deemed by the county sealer to show no signs of intentional tampering, damage, or alteration in its design or calibration while under the use or control of the owner, user, or operator.

(4) The owner, user, or operator has maintained the water submeter in accordance with
 applicable provisions of this division, and any regulations adopted under Section 12107.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a water submeter that meets all of the conditions set forth in subdivision (a) shall not be permitted to be reinstalled and placed into commercial use unless it is repaired and recalibrated by a service agent, and inspected and sealed by the county sealer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 539, Sec. 4.   (AB 2451)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.5. Service Agencies for Weighing and Measuring Devices [12531. - 12544.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [12531. - 12531.]

12531.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions are applicable:

(a) “Service agency” means a person, as defined in Section 12011, that for hire, award, commission, or any other payment of any kind, repairs a commercial device.

(b) “Service agent” means a person employed by a service agency to repair a commercial device.

(c) “Device” means a weighing or measuring equipment, contrivance, or instrument used, or designed to be used, for determining weight or measure, and includes any tool, appliance, or accessory used in connection therewith, that is used for commercial
 purposes, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 12500.

(d) “Placed in service” means to permit the use of a device that has been tested and found to be correct, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 12500, and type approved, as provided for in Section 12500.5.

(e) “Correct” means a device that meets all of the tolerance and specification requirements of Section 12107.

(f) “Repair,” in any of its variant forms, means to provide maintenance, or to install, adjust, recondition, or service a device.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 539, Sec. 5.   (AB 2451)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Registration [12532. - 12534.]

12532.

(a) No person shall engage in business as a service agency unless the person is registered by the Secretary of Food and Agriculture pursuant to this chapter and unless the current registration fee and any penalty has been paid.

(b) Applications for registration shall be in writing on a form prescribed by the department, and shall be accompanied by the required fee.

(c) A service agency shall forward to the department the name or names of service agents employed by them, with the appropriate fees required by Section 12535.

(d) A
 device may only be placed in service by a sealer or a service agency. A device used by a public utility in connection with measuring gas, electricity, water, steam, or communication service subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utility Commission is exempt from the requirements of this chapter.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (f), no person who repairs a device is required to be registered if the device is placed into service by a sealer or service agency.

(f) Vapor measuring devices operating at greater than 11 inches water column shall be installed by a service agency.

(g) In the event of any change in the legal status of a registered service agency, the new legal entity shall obtain a new registration
 before operating as a service agency.

(h) A service agency may employ or designate a licensed service agent to act for the service agency and shall be responsible for all acts of that person.

(i) If a device has been altered in such a way as to facilitate fraud, a service agency or service agent shall report it to the county sealer within 24 hours of discovering that the device has been altered. If the service agency or service agent has possession of the
 device or any mechanism, component, software, or other device attached to or used in conjunction with the device that serves to facilitate fraud, the service agency or service agent shall surrender the device, mechanism, component, software, or other device to the county sealer or local law enforcement within 24 hours of discovering that the device has been altered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 329, Sec. 2.   (AB 2307)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

12533.

Before the issuance of its registration or in order to maintain its current registration, a service agency shall do all of the following:

(a) (1) Possess, or have available for use, standards and testing equipment necessary to meet the minimum testing requirements contained in the “Notes” paragraphs of the specific device regulation set forth in Division 9 (commencing with Section 4000) of Title 4 of the California Code of Regulations, for each type of device for which the service agency is providing service.

(2) When applicable, the standards and testing equipment shall meet the
 specifications and tolerances published in the most current National Institute of Standards and Technology 105 Series Handbooks for Specifications and Tolerances for Reference Standards and Field Standard Weights and Measures.

(b) Ensure that every service agent in its employ has a current service agent license.

(c) Possess a current copy of Division 9 (commencing with Section 4000) of Title 4 of the California Code of Regulations, Field Reference Manual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 525, Sec. 2.   (AB 694)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12534.

Commencing January 1, 2001, a service agency shall use suitable and sufficient standards that are permanently and uniquely identified, and have a current certificate of accuracy provided by the department or by a laboratory certified pursuant to Section 12314, in the determination of a correct device.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 364, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fees [12535. - 12537.]

12535.

(a) An application for service agency registration shall be accompanied by an annual fee of two hundred dollars ($200) for a primary maintenance location, and one hundred dollars ($100) for each additional maintenance location of the applicant, and twenty-five dollars ($25) for every person employed by a service agency as a service agent.

(b) Each registration required by this chapter shall be renewed annually, on or before the first day of the first month of the service agency’s registration year, by application to the department, accompanied by the annual registration fee. “Registration year” means the period of time beginning with the first day of the month the service agency is required to be registered in this state, and ending one year from date of issuance of the registration.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 364, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

12536.

Fees received by the department pursuant to this chapter shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Food and Agriculture Fund to be used for the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 364, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

12537.

Sixty percent of the funds derived pursuant to this chapter shall be allocated by the secretary to counties that employ a sealer or director of weights and measures. The payment to each county shall be in proportion to the funds expended by the county in the enforcement of Division 5 (commencing with Section 12001).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 364, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Examinations [12540. - 12540.]

12540.

(a) Commencing on January 1, 2001, no person shall be employed by a service agency as a service agent unless he or she possesses a current license.

(b) Commencing on January 1, 2001, applicants for a service agent license shall pass a written examination on the laws and regulations governing weights and measures. A passing score of 70 percent or greater is required to qualify for a license pursuant to this chapter. Examinations developed by the department may be taken by appointment in any county sealer’s office or at a location designated by the Division of Measurement Standards.

(c) An application for the examination to obtain a service agent license shall be in a form prescribed by the department and shall be accompanied by a fee established by the secretary to recover costs of examination administration, payable to the county in which the examination is given, or to the Division of Measurement Standards, if the examination is given by the department.

(d) Every service agent shall be reexamined every five years. To maintain a service agent license, the reexamination shall be taken and passed on or before the date on which the examination was last taken and passed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 364, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Advisory Committee [12541. - 12541.]

12541.

(a) The department shall establish a seven-member advisory committee consisting of the following members:

(1) Two members representing registered service agencies.

(2) Two members representing county sealers or directors of weights and measures.

(3) One member representing device manufacturers.

(4) One member representing industry clients of service agencies.

(5) One member representing the general public.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the term of office of the members of the committee is three years. Vacancies shall be filled by the department for any unexpired term.

(c) Initial appointments to the committee shall be made as follows:

(1) One representative of registered service agencies, and one representative of county sealers or directors of weights and measures shall be appointed for one year.

(2) One representative of device manufacturers, one representative of county sealers or directors of weights and measures, and one representative of industry clients of service agencies shall be appointed for two years.

(3) One representative of registered service agencies, and one representative of the general public shall be appointed for three years.

(d) The committee shall be advisory to the department in all matters concerning the registration of service agencies.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 364, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Disciplinary Action [12542. - 12544.]

12542.

A service agency registration may be suspended for the actions of its service agents in violation of this division. A service agency’s registration may be revoked or suspended, or may be denied by the department, for any violation of this chapter. Proceedings for the denial, revocation, or suspension of a registration shall be in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The department shall have all of the powers that are granted therein.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 364, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

12543.

A service agency’s authorization to place devices into service, or to remove out-of-order notices may be suspended by a county sealer, within his or her county, pursuant to the notice and hearing provisions described in Section 12544 for violations of this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 364, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

12544.

(a) A county sealer intending to suspend the authorization of a service agency shall notify the service agency in writing of all of the following:

(1) The alleged violations to be used as the basis for suspension.

(2) The proposed duration of the suspension.

(3) The date the suspension is to begin, which may not be sooner than 20 days after a notice is mailed.

(4) The names of service agents to be affected by the suspension.

(5) The fact that the service agency or service agent shall be provided the opportunity for an investigational hearing prior to the suspension.

(6) The fact that the service agency or service agent may be represented by legal counsel.

(7) The fact that the service agency or service agent may appeal to the department prior to imposition of a suspension.

(b) A copy of the proposed action to the service agency shall be immediately forwarded to the department.

(c) The department may, as a result of the investigative hearing, declare the suspension to be effective in additional counties.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 364, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Fair Packaging and Labeling Act [12601. - 12615.5.]

12601.

This chapter is designed to protect purchasers of any commodity within its provisions against deception or misrepresentation. Packages and their labels should enable consumers to obtain accurate information as to the quantity of the contents and should facilitate value comparisons.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the Legislature to assist in attaining these goals.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1309.)
-------------------------------------------

12602.

(a) It is unlawful for any person engaged in the packaging or labeling of any commodity for distribution or sale, or for any person (other than a common carrier for hire, a contract carrier for hire, or a freight forwarder for hire) engaged in the distribution of any packaged or labeled commodity, to distribute or to cause to be distributed any such commodity if the commodity is contained in a package, or if there is
 affixed to that commodity a label, which does not conform to the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted under the authority of this chapter or the provisions of, or the regulations adopted under, Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 13400) or Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 13700).

(b) The prohibition contained in subdivision (a) does not apply to persons engaged in business as wholesale or retail distributors of commodities, except to the extent that those persons (1) are engaged in the packaging or labeling of such commodities, (2) prescribe or specify by any means the manner in which such commodities are packaged or labeled, or (3) have knowledge of the violation of any provision of this chapter or of Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 12665), Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 13400), or Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 13700).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 59.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12603.

No person subject to the prohibition in Section 12602 shall distribute any packaged commodity unless it is in conformity with regulations that shall be established by the secretary that shall provide:

(a) The commodity shall bear a label specifying the identity of the commodity and the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor.

(b) The net quantity of contents (in terms of weight or mass, measure, numerical count, or time) shall be separately and accurately stated in a uniform location upon the principal display panel of that label, using the most appropriate units of both the customary inch-pound system of measure, and except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), the SI (Systeme International d’Unites) metric system.

(c) On a random package labeled in terms of pounds and decimal fractions of the pound, the statement may be carried out to not more than three decimal places and is not required to, but may include a statement in terms of the SI metric system carried out to not more than three decimal places.

(d) The requirements of subdivision (b) concerning labeling using the metric system do not apply to nonconsumer packages, foods that are
 packaged at the retail store level, or to the sale or distribution of products whose labels have been printed prior to February 14, 1994.

(e) This section shall become operative on February 14, 1994.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 60.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12605.

No person subject to the prohibition contained in Section 12602 shall distribute or cause to be distributed in commerce any packaged commodity if any qualifying words or phrases appear in conjunction with the separate statement of the net quantity of contents required by Section 12603(b), but nothing in this chapter shall prohibit supplemental statements, at other places on the package, describing in nondeceptive terms the net quantity of contents: provided, that such supplemental statements of net quantity of contents shall not include any term qualifying a unit of weight, measure, or count that tends to exaggerate the amount of the commodity contained in the package.

In no case shall any declaration of quantity be qualified by the addition of the words “minimum,” or “when packed,” or words of similar import; nor shall any unit of weight, measure or count be qualified by any term (such as jumbo, giant, full, or the like) that tends to exaggerate the amount of the commodity in the package.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1309.)
-------------------------------------------

12606.

(a) No container wherein commodities are packed shall have a false bottom, false sidewalls, false lid or covering, or be otherwise so constructed or filled, wholly or partially, as to facilitate the perpetration of deception or fraud.

(b) No container shall be made, formed, or filled as to be misleading. A container that does not allow the consumer to fully
 view its contents shall be considered to be filled as to be misleading if it contains nonfunctional slack fill. Slack fill is the difference between the actual capacity of a container and the volume of product contained therein. Nonfunctional slack fill is the empty space in a package that is filled to substantially less than its capacity for reasons other than any one or more of the following:

(1) Protection of the contents of the package.

(2) The requirements of machines used for enclosing the contents of the package.

(3) Unavoidable product settling during shipping and handling.

(4) The need to utilize a larger than required package or container to provide adequate space for the legible presentation of mandatory and necessary labeling information,
 such as those based on the regulations adopted by the United States Food and Drug Administration or state or federal agencies under federal or state law, laws or regulations adopted by foreign governments, or under an industrywide voluntary labeling program.

(5) The fact that the product consists of a commodity that is packaged in a decorative or representational container where the container is part of the presentation of the product and has value that is both significant in proportion to the value of the product and independent of its function to hold the product, such as a gift combined with a container that is intended for further use after the product is consumed, or durable commemorative or promotional packages.

(6) An inability to increase the level of fill or to further reduce the size of the package, such as where some minimum package size is necessary to accommodate
 required labeling, discourage pilfering, facilitate handling, or accommodate tamper-resistant devices.

(7) The product container bears a reasonable relationship to the actual amount of product contained inside, and the dimensions of the actual product container, the product, or the amount of product therein is visible to the consumer at the point of sale, or where obvious secondary use packaging is involved.

(8) One or more of the following:

(A) The dimensions of the product or immediate product container are visible through the exterior packaging.

(B) The actual size of the product or immediate product container is clearly and conspicuously depicted on any side of the exterior packaging, excluding the bottom, accompanied by a clear and conspicuous
 disclosure that the depiction is the “actual size” of the product or immediate product container. If there are multiple units of the same product in a package, only one “actual size” depiction is required per same size product or immediate product container.

(C) A line or a graphic that represents the product or product fill and a statement communicating that the line or graphic represents the product or product fill such as “Fill Line,” both of which are clearly and conspicuously depicted on exterior packaging or the immediate product container if visible at point of sale. If the product is subject to settling, the line shall represent the minimum amount of product after settling.

(9) The presence of any headspace within an immediate product container necessary to facilitate the mixing, adding, shaking, or dispensing of liquids or powders by consumers before use.

(10) The exterior packaging contains a product delivery or dosing device if the device is visible, or a clear and conspicuous depiction of the device appears on the exterior packaging, or it is readily apparent from the conspicuous exterior disclosures or the nature and name of the product that a delivery or dosing device is contained in the package.

(11) The exterior packaging or immediate product container is a kit that consists of a system, or multiple components, designed to produce a particular result that is not dependent upon the quantity of the contents, if the purpose of the kit is clearly and conspicuously disclosed on the exterior packaging.

(12) The exterior packaging of the product is routinely displayed using tester units or demonstrations to consumers in retail stores, so that customers can see the
 actual, immediate container of the product being sold, or a depiction of the actual size thereof before purchase.

(13) The exterior packaging consists of single or multiunit presentation boxes of holiday or gift packages if the purchaser can adequately determine the quantity and sizes of the immediate product container at the point of sale.

(14) The exterior packaging is for a combination of one purchased product, together with a free sample or gift, wherein the exterior packaging is necessarily larger than it would otherwise be due to the inclusion of the sample or gift, if the presence of both products and the quantity of each product are clearly and conspicuously disclosed on the exterior packaging.

(15) The exterior packaging or immediate product container encloses computer hardware or software designed to serve
 a particular computer function, if the particular computer function to be performed by the computer hardware or software is clearly and conspicuously disclosed on the exterior packaging.

(16) The mode of commerce does not allow the consumer to view or handle the physical container or product.

(c) Slack fill in a package shall not be used as grounds to allege a violation of this section based solely on its presence unless it is nonfunctional slack fill.

(d) Any sealer may seize a container that facilitates the perpetration of deception or fraud and the contents of the container. By order of the superior court of the county within which a violation of this section occurs, the containers seized shall be condemned and destroyed or released upon conditions the court may impose to ensure against their use in violation of
 this chapter. The contents of any condemned container shall be returned to the owner thereof if the owner furnishes proper facilities for the return. A proceeding under this section is a limited civil case if the value of the property in controversy is less than or equal to the maximum amount in controversy for a limited civil case under Section 85 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 544, Sec. 1.   (AB 2632)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

12606.2.

(a) This section applies to food containers subject to Section 403(d) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 343(d)), and Section 100.100 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Section 12606 does not apply to food containers subject to this section.

(b) No food containers shall be made, formed, or filled as to be
 misleading.

(c) A container that does not allow the consumer to fully view its contents shall be considered to be filled as to be misleading if it contains nonfunctional slack fill. Slack fill is the difference between the actual capacity of a container and the volume of product contained therein. Nonfunctional slack fill is the empty space in a package that is filled to substantially less than its capacity for reasons other than any one or more of the following:

(1) Protection of the contents of the package.

(2) The requirements of the machines used for enclosing the contents in the package.

(3) Unavoidable product settling during shipping and handling.

(4) The need for the package to
 perform a specific function, such as where packaging plays a role in the preparation or consumption of a food, if that function is inherent to the nature of the food and is clearly communicated to consumers.

(5) The fact that the product consists of a food packaged in a reusable container where the container is part of the presentation of the food and has value that is both significant in proportion to the value of the product and independent of its function to hold the food, such as a gift product consisting of a food or foods combined with a container that is intended for further use after the food is consumed or durable commemorative or promotional packages.

(6) Inability to increase the level of fill or to further reduce the size of the package, such as where some minimum package size is necessary to accommodate required food labeling exclusive of any vignettes or other
 nonmandatory designs or label information, discourage pilfering, facilitate handling, or accommodate tamper-resistant devices.

(7) One or more of the following:

(A) The dimensions of the product or immediate product container are visible through the exterior packaging.

(B) The actual size of the product or immediate product container is clearly and conspicuously depicted on any side of the exterior packaging, excluding the bottom, accompanied by a clear and conspicuous disclosure that the depiction is the “actual size” of the product or immediate product container. If there are multiple units of the same product in a package, only one “actual size” depiction is required per same size product or immediate product container.

(C) A line or a graphic that
 represents the product or product fill and a statement communicating that the line or graphic represents the product or product fill such as “Fill Line,” both of which are clearly and conspicuously depicted on exterior packaging or the immediate product container if visible at point of sale. If the product is subject to settling, the line shall represent the minimum amount of product after settling.

(8) The mode of commerce does not allow the consumer to view or handle the physical container or product.

(d) Slack fill in a package shall not be used as grounds to allege a violation of this section based solely on its presence unless it is nonfunctional slack fill.

(e) This section shall be interpreted consistent with the comments by the United States Food and Drug Administration on the regulations contained in Section
 100.100 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, interpreting Section 403(d) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 343(d)), as those comments are reported on pages 64123 to 64137, inclusive, of Volume 58 of the Federal Register.

(f) If the requirements of this section do not impose the same requirements as are imposed by Section 403(d) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 343(d)), or any regulation promulgated pursuant thereto, then this section is not operative to the extent that it is not identical to the federal requirements, and for this purpose those federal requirements are incorporated into this section and shall apply as if they were set forth in this section.

(g) Any sealer may seize any container that is in violation of this section and the contents of the container. By order of the superior court of the county within